South Dakota, session 2026, HB1062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 22-18-1.1 be AMENDED:
22-18-1.1. No person may:
(1) Cause or attempt to cause serious bodily injury to another under circumstances
manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life;
(2) Attempt to cause, or knowingly cause, bodily injury to another with a dangerous
weapon;
(3) Assault another with intent to commit bodily injury, which results in serious bodily
injury;
(4) Attempt by physical menace with a deadly weapon or a physical object realistically
simulating a deadly weapon to put another in fear of imminent serious bodily harm;
or
(5) Attempt to induce a fear of death or imminent serious bodily harm by impeding the
normal breathing or circulation of the blood of another person by applying pressure
on the throat or neck, or by blocking the nose and mouth.
A person who violates this section is guilty of aggravated assault. Aggravated
assault is a Class 3 felony.

26.658.11 2 1062
An Act to revise a provision related to aggravated assault.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1062
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1062 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1062 ENROLLED